en: Lemon soft drinks, Lemon sodas
de: Zitronenlimonaden
es: Sodas a base de limón, Sodas de limón
fi: Sitruunavirvoitusjuomat
fr: Sodas au citron, soda citron, soda au citron
hr: Bezalkoholna pića s limunom
hu: Citromos üdítőiatlok
it: Bibite gassate al limone, Bibite gassate al gusto di limone
lt: Citrinų gaivieji gėrimai, Gazuotas citrinų gaivusis gėrimas
nl: Citroenfrisdranken

en: Orange soft drinks, Orange sodas
de: Orangenlimonaden
es: Sodas a base de naranja, Sodas de naranja
fi: appelsiinivirvoitusjuomat
fr: Sodas à l'orange, soda orange, soda à l'orange
hr: Narančasta bezalkoholna pića
hu: Narancsos üdítőitalok
it: Aranciate, Bibite gassate all'arancia, Bibite gassate al gusto di arancia
lt: Apelsinų gaivieji gėrimai, Gazuotas apelsinų gaivusis gėrimas
nl: Sinas, Sinasappelfrisdranken

en: Sodas with exotic fruits
de: Exotische Fruchtlimonaden
fr: Sodas aux fruits exotiques, soda aux fruits exotiques
hr: Gazirana pića s egzotičnim voćem
hu: Déli gyümölcsös üdítőiatlok, Üdítőitalok déli gyümölcsökkel, Egzotikus gyümölcsös üdítőiatlok, Üdítőitalok egzotikus gyümölcsökkel
it: Bibite gassate alla frutta esotica, Bibite gassate al gusto di frutta esotica, Bibite gassate alla frutta tropicale, Bibite gassate al gusto di frutta tropicale
lt: Topinių vaisių gaivieji gėrimai, Gazuotas tropinių vaisių gaivusis gėrimas
nl: Exotische vruchtenfrisdranken

en: Energy drinks
bg: Енергийни напитки
de: Energy-Drinks
es: Bebidas energéticas, Bebidas hipertónicas, Bebidas energizantes
fi: energiajuomat
fr: Boissons énergisantes, Boissons énergétiques
he: משקאות אנרגיה
hr: Energetska pića
hu: Energiaitalok
it: Bevande energetiche
ja: エナジードリンク
lt: Energetiniai gėrimai, energetinis gėrimas
nl: Energiedranken
pl: Napoje energetyczne, Napoje energetyzujące
pt: Bebidas energéticas
ro: Băuturi energizante, Bauturi energizante, Bautura Energizanta
ru: Энергетические напитки, Энергетический напиток, Напитки энергетические, Напиток энергетический
sv: Energidrycker
tr: Enerji içeceği
zh: 能量饮料

en: Energy drink with sugar
bg: Енергийна напитка със захар
de: Energydrink mit Zucker
fr: Boisson énergisante sucrée
hr: Energetsko piće sa šećerom
hu: Cukros energiaitalok
lt: energetinis gėrimas su cukrumi, energetiniai gėrimai su cukrumi
nl: Energiedranken met suiker
pl: Napoje energetyczne z cukrem, Napoje energetyzujące z cukrem, Napój energetyczny z cukrem

en: Energy drink without sugar and with artificial sweeteners
bg: Енергийна напитка без захар и с изкуствени подсладители
fr: Boisson énergisante non sucrée avec édulcorants
hr: Energetski napitak bez šećera i s umjetnim sladilima
hu: Mesterséges édesítőszer nélküli cukormentes energiaitalok
lt: Energetinis gėrimas be cukraus ir su dirbtiniais saldikliais
nl: Energiedranken zonder suiker met artificiële zoetstoffen
pl: Napój energetyczny bez cukru i ze sztucznymi słodzikami

en: Lemonades, Lemonade
ar: شراب الليمون
az: Limonad
ba: Лимонад
be: Ліманад
bg: Лимонада
bn: লেবুর শরবত
br: Limonadez
bs: Limunada
ca: Llimonada
cs: Limonáda
cv: Лимонад
cy: Lemonêd
da: Limonader, Lemonader
de: Limonaden, Limonade
el: Λεμονάδα
eo: Limonadoj
es: Limonadas, Limonada
et: Limonaad
eu: Limonada
fa: شربت آبلیمو
fi: Sitruunasooda
fr: Limonades, Limonade
ga: Líomanáid dhearg
gl: Limoada
he: לימונדה
hi: नींबू का रस
hr: Limunade, Limunada
ht: Limonad
hu: Limonádék, Limonádé
hy: Լիմոնադ
id: Limun
io: Limonado
it: Limonata, Bibita gassata
ja: レモネード
jv: Lemonade
ka: Ლიმონათი
kk: Лимонад
ko: 레모네이드
la: Limonata
lb: Limonad
lt: Limonadai, Limonadas
lv: Limonāde
mi: Namunēra
mk: Лимонада
ml: നാരങ്ങാവെള്ളം
mr: लिंबू सरबत
ms: Lemonade
nb: Limonader
ne: लेमोनेड
nl: Limonade, Limonades
nn: Limonadar
oc: Limonada
pa: ਸ਼ਿਕੰਜਵੀ
pl: Lemoniada, Lemoniady
pt: Limonada
ro: Limonadă, Limonada
ru: Лимонад
sd: سڪنجبين
sh: Limunada
sl: Limonada
sq: Limonada
sr: Лимунада
ta: எலுமிச்சைச்சாறு
tr: Limonata
uk: Лимонад
ur: سکنجبین
uz: Limonad
vi: Nước vị chanh
zh: 檸檬水

en: Lemonades with sugar, Lemonade with sugar
bg: Лимонада със захар
fi: Sokerinen limonadi
fr: Limonade sucrée
hr: Limunada sa šećerom
hu: Cukros limonádék
lt: Limonadas su cukrumi
nl: Limonade met suiker

en: Lemonades with sugar and artificial sweeteners, Lemonade with sugar and artificial sweeteners
bg: Лимонада със захар и изкуствени подсладители
fr: Limonade sucrée avec édulcorants
hr: Limunada sa šećerom i umjetnim sladilima
hu: Cukros limonádék mesterséges édesítőszerrel
lt: Limonadas su cukrumi ir dirbtiniais saldikliais
nl: Limonade met suiker en artificiële zoetstoffen

en: Lemonade without sugar with artificial sweeteners
fr: Limonade non sucrée avec édulcorants
hr: Limunada bez šećera s umjetnim sladilima
hu: Cukormentes limonádék mesterséges édesítőszerrel
lt: Limonadas be cukraus su dirbtiniais saldikliais
nl: Limonade zonder suiker met artificiële zoetstoffen

en: Lemonade with flavoured syrup
fr: Diabolo, Limonade et sirop

en: Mint-flavoured syrup with sugar diluted in water, Strawberry-flavoured syrup with sugar diluted in water
fr: Boisson préparée sucrée à partir de sirop à la menthe à diluer dans l'eau, Boisson préparée sucrée à partir de sirop aux fraises à diluer dans l'eau

en: Chinotto
fr: Chinotto
it: Chinotto

en: Colas, Cola, Cola sodas
bg: Кола
ca: Cola, Coles
da: Cola
de: Cola
es: Bebidas de cola
fi: Kolajuomat, Kolat
fr: Sodas au cola, soda au cola, colas, sodas colas
he: קולה
hr: Kola kola
hu: Kólák, Colák
it: Cola, Cole, Bibite gassate al gusto di cola
ja: コーラ
lt: Kola, Kolos
nl: Cola's, Colas
pl: Cola, Kola
pt: Colas
ro: Cola
tr: Kola
zh: 可乐

en: Cola with sugar
bg: Кола със захар
de: Cola mit Zucker
es: Cola con azúcar
fr: Cola sucré
hr: Kola sa šećerom
hu: Cukros kólák, Kóla cukorral
it: Cola con zucchero
lt: Kola su cukrumi
nl: Cola met suiker

en: Cola with sugar and artificial sweetener, Cola with sugar and artificial sweeteners
bg: Кола със захар и изкуствени подсладители
de: Cola mit Zucker und künstlichen Süßstoffen
es: Cola con azúcar y edulcorantes artificiales
fr: Cola sucré avec édulcorants
hr: Cola sa šećerom i umjetnim sladilom
hu: Cukros kólák mesterséges édesítőszerrel
it: Cola con zucchero e dolcificante artificiale
lt: Kola su cukrumi ir dirbtiniais saldikliais
nl: Cola met suiker en artificiële zoetstoffen

en: Cola sodas without caffeine
bg: Кола без кофеин
ca: Cola sense cafeïna
da: Koffeinfri cola
de: Koffeinfreie Colas
es: Cola sin cafeína
fi: Kofeiinittomat kolajuomat
fr: Sodas au cola sans caféine
he: קולה ללא קפאין
hr: Cola gazirana pića bez kofeina
hu: Koffeinmentes kólák
it: Bibite alla cola senza caffeina, Cole senza caffeina
lt: Kola be kafeino
nl: Caffeinevrije colas
pl: Kola bez kofeiny
pt: Cola sem cafeína
ro: Cola fără cafeină
tr: Kafeinsiz kola
zh: 无咖啡因可乐

en: Cola with sugar and without caffeine
bg: Кола със захар и без кофеин
ca: Cola amb sucre i sense cafeïna
da: Cola med sukker og uden koffein
de: Cola mit Zucker und ohne Koffein
es: Cola con azúcar y sin cafeína
fi: Sokerilla makeutettu kofeiiniton cola
fr: Cola sucré sans caféine
he: קולה עם סוכר ובלי קפאין
hr: Cola sa šećerom i bez kofeina
hu: Koffeinmentes cukros kólák, Cukros koffeinmentes kólák
it: Cola con zucchero e senza caffeina
lt: Kola su cukrumi ir be kofeino
nl: Cola met suiker en zonder cafeïne
pl: Cola z cukrem i bez kofeiny
pt: Cola com açúcar e sem cafeína
ro: Cola cu zahăr și fără cofeină

en: Plant-based beverages
bg: Растителни напитки
ca: Begudes amb base vegetal
da: Plantebaserede drikkevarer
de: Pflanzliche Getränke
es: Bebidas de origen vegetal
fi: Kasvipohjaiset juomat
fr: Boissons à base de végétaux
he: משקאות מבוססי צמחים
hr: Pića na biljnoj bazi
hu: Növényi alapú italok
it: Bevande a base di piante
ja: 植物ベースの飲み物
ko: 식물성 음료
lt: Augalinės kilmės gėrimai, Augalinės gėrimai
nl: Plantaardige dranken
pl: Napoje na bazie roślin, Napoje roślinne
pt: Bebidas à base de plantas
ro: Băuturi din plante
ru: Напитки из растений
sv: Växtbaserade drycker
th: เครื่องดื่มจากพืช
tr: Bitkisel içecekler, Bitki kaynaklı içecekler, Bitki içecekleri
zh: 植物性饮料

en: Coconut waters, coconut water
ar: ماء جوز الهند, ماء جوز الهند الطازج
az: Kokos suyu
bg: Кокосова вода
bn: ডাবের পানি
ca: Aigua de coco
cs: Kokosová voda
da: Kokosvand, Kokosnøddevand
de: Kokoswasser
el: Νερό καρύδας
eo: Kokosakvoj
es: Agua de coco
eu: Koko-ur
fa: آب نارگیل
fi: Kookosvedet, Kookosvesi
fr: Eaux de coco, Eau de coco, Eaux de noix de coco, Eau de noix de coco
hi: नारियल पानी
hr: Kokosove vode, Kokosova voda
hu: Kókuszvizek, Kókuszvíz
hy: Կոկոսի ջուր
id: Air kelapa
it: Acqua di cocco
ja: ココナッツウォーター, ココナッツジュース
jv: Banyu krambil
ko: 코코넛워터
lt: Kokosų vanduo
lv: Kokosriekstu sula
mk: Кокосова вода
ml: ഇളനീർ
ms: Air kelapa
my: အုန်းရည်
ne: नरिवलको पानी
nl: Kokoswater
pl: Woda kokosowa
pt: Águas de coco
ru: Кокосовая вода
sa: नारिकेलजलम्
si: තැඹිලි වතුර, කුරුම්බා වතුර සහ පොල් වතුර
sk: Kokosová voda
sl: Kokosova voda
sq: Uji i kokosit
sr: Кокосова вода
sv: Kokosvatten, Kokosnötvatten
sw: Dafu
ta: இளநீர்
te: కొబ్బరినీరు
tr: Hindistan cevizi suyu
uk: Кокосова вода
vi: Nước dừa
zh: 椰子水